Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.095

Failure to meet certification requirements—Director's options—Notice—Hearing.

The director may suspend, cancel, or refuse certification or other approval of any planting stock that fails to meet the certification requirements authorized in this chapter. Upon notice by the director to suspend, cancel, or refuse certification or other approval of any planting stock, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1999 c 144 s 10.]